Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-223
Village situated in more than one county; tax; how certified.

Taxes levied for village purposes, in villages situated in two or more counties, shall be certified to the county clerk of each county in which any part of such village is situated, and such county clerks shall place such certifications on the proper tax list.

Laws 1893, c. 9, § 5, p. 139;

R.S.1913, § 5073;

C.S.1922, § 4245;

C.S.1929, § 17-223;

R.S.1943, § 17-223;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 89.

A tax levy in a village situated in two or more counties shall be certified to the county clerks. Village of Wakefield v. Utecht, 90 Neb. 252, 133 N.W. 240 (1911).